Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-206
Compulsory attendance; nonattendance lists; transmission to enforcement officers.

Each superintendent or administrator of a school district, upon the receipt of the list specified in section 79-205, shall (1) compare the names of the children enrolled with the last census report on file in his or her office from such district, (2) prepare a list of all children resident in such district under his or her jurisdiction who are not attending school as provided in section 79-201, and (3) transmit the list to the officer or officers in such district whose duty it is to enforce the provisions of such section.

Laws 1901, c. 70, § 1, p. 454;

Laws 1903, c. 95, § 1, p. 549;

Laws 1905, c. 140, § 1, p. 575;

Laws 1907, c. 131, § 1, p. 430;

R.S.1913, § 6924;

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 1, p. 346;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(f), p. 228;

C.S.1922, § 6508d;

C.S.1929, § 79-1904;

R.S.1943, § 79-1911;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 14, p. 694;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-208;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 26.